District of Columbia statutes.
34-406

Action pending March 4, 1913, unaffected by this subtitle.

This subtitle shall not affect actions or proceedings, civil or criminal, or quasi-criminal, pending on March 4, 1913, but the same may be prosecuted or defended as provided by preexisting law or regulation.

Mar. 4, 1913, 37 Stat. 996, ch. 150, § 8, par. 102
1981 Ed., § 43-106.
1973 Ed., § 43-1006.